Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 1. Interstate System.

§ 33.2-300.
Power and authority of Commonwealth Transportation Board relating to the Interstate System, generally.

The Board may plan, designate, acquire, open, construct, reconstruct, improve, maintain, discontinue, abandon, and regulate the use of the Interstate System in the same manner in which it is now or may be authorized to plan, designate, acquire, open, construct, reconstruct, improve, maintain, discontinue, abandon, and regulate the use of the primary state highway system. The Board may vacate, close, or change the location of any highway or street in the manner in which it is now authorized by law to vacate, close, or change the location of a highway in the primary state highway system. The Board has any and all other authority and power relative to the Interstate System as is vested in it relative to highways in the primary state highway system, including the right to acquire by purchase, eminent domain, grant, or dedication title to lands or rights-of-way for such interstate highways whether within or without the limits of any city or town, and in addition thereto has such other power, control, and jurisdiction necessary to comply with the provisions of the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1956 and all acts amendatory or supplementary thereto, all other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-36.2; 1958, c. 589; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-49; 2014, c. 805.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Turnpikes and Tollroads, § 4.

§ 33.2-301.
Contracts for maintenance of components of Interstate System.

All maintenance on components of the Interstate System, excluding frontage roads, shall be carried out under contracts awarded by the Commissioner of Highways or the Board pursuant to §§

33.2-209

,

33.2-214

, and

33.2-221

, except for instances where good and sufficient reasons for not doing so have been shown in advance in writing by the Commissioner of Highways to the Board and to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Transportation, the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Finance, the Senate Committee on Transportation, and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the Department from performing emergency work at any time on the Interstate System with its own employees or agents or to assume the maintenance responsibilities of a contractor who has been determined to be in default or as a result of a contract termination.

History.

2006, c. 782, § 33.1-49.1; 2012, cc. 729, 733; 2014, c. 805.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 782, cl. 2, which enacted the prior provision, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to asset management or maintenance services agreed to as part of the initial provisions of an interim or comprehensive agreement entered into for the construction or reconstruction of or improvements to any highway pursuant to the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§ 56-556 et seq.) of the Code of Virginia.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

§ 33.2-302.
Funds for establishment and maintenance of Interstate System, generally.

The highways embraced within the Interstate System shall be established, constructed, and maintained by the Commonwealth under the direction and supervision of the Commissioner of Highways with state funds as may be appropriated and made available for such purposes, together with such appropriations as may be made by any locality in the Commonwealth and funds as are now available or that may be derived from the federal government for such purposes. State funds for repayment of federal construction advances may be raised by toll facilities, if approved by the Federal Highway Administration.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-36.3; 1958, c. 589; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-50; 1982, c. 261; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-303.
Portions of Interstate System within cities and towns.

Whenever any portion of the Interstate System that is to be constructed within cities or towns is to occupy existing streets, the right-of-way in the street shall be occupied by the Interstate System free of cost to the Commonwealth.

When the Interstate System extending into or through cities or towns has been constructed to the required standards, streets or highways occupied thereby shall cease to be maintained and controlled by the governing bodies of such cities or towns, and such cities and towns shall thereafter be relieved from all civil liability arising from the physical condition of such streets or highways. Such streets and highways shall not be considered as mileage for which the Board is required to make payment to such cities or towns by any other provision of law.

Nothing contained in this article shall relieve the cities or towns through which any portion of the Interstate System is projected from the responsibility for the preservation of public peace, prevention of crime, apprehension of criminals, protection of the rights of persons and property, and enforcement of the laws of the Commonwealth, and the regulations enacted pursuant thereto, nor shall anything contained herein be considered as a waiver by the Commonwealth of its immunity from liability for tort.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-36.5; 1958, c. 589; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-51; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-304.
Transfer of highways, bridges, and streets from the secondary and primary state highway systems to Interstate System.

The Board may transfer such highways, bridges, and streets as it deems proper from the primary or secondary state highway system to the Interstate System. Upon such transfer, the highways, bridges, and streets so transferred shall become for all purposes parts of the Interstate System and thereafter cease being parts of the primary or secondary state highway system. The Board may add such highways, bridges, and streets as it deems proper to the Interstate System without limitations as to mileage.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-36.6; 1958, c. 589; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-52; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-305.
Transfer of highways, bridges, and streets from Interstate System to primary or secondary state highway system.

The Board may transfer such highways, bridges, and streets as it deems proper from the Interstate System to the primary or secondary state highway system without limitations as to mileage. Upon such transfer, the highways, bridges, and streets so transferred shall become for all purposes parts of the primary or secondary state highway system and thereafter cease being parts of the Interstate System.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-36.7; 1958, c. 589; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-53; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-306.
Applicability of §§ 33.2-300 through 33.2-305 to toll projects.

The provisions of §§

33.2-300

through

33.2-305

shall not become effective with respect to those segments of the Interstate System constructed and financed as toll projects until the revenue bonds and the interest thereon issued on account of such toll projects have been paid or a sufficient amount for the payment of all such bonds and the interest to maturity thereon has been set aside in trust for the benefit of the respective bondholders. When the bonds and interest thereon, outstanding on account of such projects, have been paid or a sufficient amount for the payment of such bonds and the interest thereon to the maturity thereof has been so set aside in trust, and when the Board has by formal action, recorded in its minutes, determined the existence of such fact, then the provisions of §§

33.2-300

through

33.2-308

shall fully apply to such projects.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-36.8; 1958, c. 589; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-54; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-307.
Relocation or removal of utility facilities within projects on Interstate System.

For the purposes of this section:“Cost of highway construction” includes the cost of relocating or removing utility facilities in connection with any project on the Interstate System within cities or towns.“Cost of relocation or removal” includes the entire amount paid by such utility properly attributable to such relocation or removal after deducting any increase in the value of the new facility and any salvage value derived from the old facility.“Facility of a utility” includes tracks, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, and other structures, equipment, and appliances.“Utility” includes publicly, privately, and cooperatively owned utilities.

Whenever the Board determines that it is necessary that any facility of a utility in, on, under, over, or along existing streets that are to be included within any project on the Interstate System within cities or towns should be relocated or removed, the owner or operator of such facility shall relocate or remove the same in accordance with the order of the Board. The cost of such relocation or removal, including the cost of installing such facility in a new location, and the cost of any lands, or any rights or interest in lands, and any other rights required to accomplish such relocation or removal shall be ascertained and paid by the Board as a part of the cost of the project.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-36.9; 1958, c. 589; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-55; 1972, c. 79; 1983, c. 162; 2003, c. 302; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-308.
Additional provisions on relocation or removal of utility facilities within projects on Interstate System.

For the purposes of this section:“Cost of highway construction” includes the cost of relocating or removing utility facilities in connection with any project on the Interstate System or primary state highway system within counties.“Cost of relocation or removal” includes the entire amount paid by such utility properly attributable to such relocation or removal after deducting therefrom any increase in the value of the new facility and any salvage value derived from the old facility.“Facility of a utility” includes pipes, mains, storm sewers, water lines, sanitary sewers, natural gas facilities, or other structures, equipment, and appliances.

Whenever the Board determines that it is necessary to relocate or remove any facility of a utility owned by (i) a county, (ii) a political subdivision of the Commonwealth or county, or (iii) a nonprofit, consumer-owned company, located in a county having a population of at least 32,000 but no more than 34,000, that (a) is exempt from income taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, (b) is organized to provide suitable drinking water, (c) has no assistance from investors, (d) does not pay dividends, and (e) does not sell stock to the general public, or storm sewers, water lines, natural gas facilities, or sanitary sewers owned by a city and extending into any county in, on, under, over, or along existing highways that are to be included within any project on the Interstate System or the primary state highway system within any county, the county or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or county, consumer-owned company, or city shall relocate or remove the same in accordance with the order of the Board. The cost of such relocation or removal including the cost of installing such facility in a new location, and the cost of any lands, or any rights or interest in lands, and any other rights required to accomplish such relocation or removal shall be ascertained and paid by the Board as a part of the cost of the project.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-36.10; 1964, c. 353; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-56; 1989, c. 46; 1998, c. 219; 1999, c. 942; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-309.
Tolls for use of Interstate System components.

Subject to the limitations provided in §

33.2-119

and in accordance with all applicable federal and state statutes and requirements, the Board may impose and collect tolls from all classes of vehicles in amounts established by the Board for the use of any component of the Interstate System within the Commonwealth.

The toll facilities authorized by this section shall be subject to the provisions of federal law for the purpose of tolling motor vehicles to finance interstate construction and reconstruction, promote efficiency in the use of highways, reduce traffic congestion, and improve air quality and for such other purposes as may be permitted by federal law.

In order to mitigate traffic congestion in the vicinity of the toll facilities, no toll facility shall be operated without high-speed automated toll collection technology designed to allow motorists to travel through the toll facilities without stopping to make payments. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a toll facility from retaining means of nonautomated toll collection in some lanes of the facility. The Board shall also consider traffic congestion and mitigation thereof and the impact on local traffic movement as factors in determining the location of the toll facilities authorized pursuant to this section.

The revenues collected from each toll facility established pursuant to this section shall be deposited into segregated subaccounts in the Transportation Trust Fund and may be allocated by the Board as the Board deems appropriate to:

Pay or finance all or part of the costs of programs or projects, including the costs of planning, operation, maintenance, and improvements incurred in connection with the toll facility, provided that such allocations shall be limited to programs and projects that are reasonably related to or benefit the users of the toll facility. The priorities of metropolitan planning organizations, planning district commissions, local governments, and transportation corridors shall be considered by the Board in making project allocations from such revenues deposited into the Transportation Trust Fund.

Repay funds from the Toll Facilities Revolving Account or the Transportation Partnership Opportunity Fund.

Pay the Board’s reasonable costs and expenses incurred in the administration and management of the toll facility.

History.

2007, c. 477, § 33.1-23.03:10; 2008, cc. 602, 838; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 681; 2016, c. 780; 2017, c. 836; 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 477, cl. 2, which enacted prior similar provision, former § 33.1-23.03:10, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to Chapter 22 of Title 56 [now Chapter 18 of Title 33.2] or any payment received by the Commonwealth Transportation Board pursuant to § 33.1-23.03:9 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2016, c. 780, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 836, became effective May 24, 2016.

Acts 2016, c. 780, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 836 and Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, provides: “That the provisions of this act adding §

33.2-118

[now

33.2-119

] to the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

33.2-309

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall become effective upon the return of the Commonwealth’s spot in the Interstate System Reconstruction and Rehabilitation Pilot Program.” On May 24, 2016, Commissioner of the Virginia Department of Transportation returned the Commonwealth’s spot in the Interstate System Reconstruction and Rehabilitation Pilot Program to the federal government. The amendment became effective May 24, 2016.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 681 in subsection A, deleted “Route” preceding “81” in the second sentence; and added the third sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 780, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 836, in subsection A, substituted “Subject to the limitations provided in §

33.2-119

” for “Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this title” and deleted the last three sentences which read “However, prior approval of the General Assembly shall be required prior to the imposition and collection of any toll for use of all or any portion of Interstate 81. Prior approval of the General Assembly shall also be required prior to the imposition or collection of any toll for use of Interstate 95 south of Fredericksburg pursuant to the Interstate System Reconstruction or Rehabilitation Pilot Program. Such funds so collected shall be deposited into the Transportation Trust Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1524

, subject to allocation by the Board as provided in this section.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Turnpikes and Tollroads, §§ 2, 5, 6.